Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1 MUNICIPAL ANNEXATION ACT OF 1965
31-12-109. Hearing.

Any person may appear at such hearing and present evidence upon any matter to be determined by the governing body.

All proceedings at the hearing and any continuances thereof shall be recorded, but the recorder's notes need not be transcribed unless proceedings for judicial review are initiated as provided in section 31-12-116.

The board of trustees of a town may dispense with the reporting of the hearing as provided in this section and substitute in lieu thereof minutes summarizing the presentation of each speaker and describing the proceedings of the hearing. In the event that any proceedings are commenced for judicial review of an annexation in which this subsection (3) has been followed, the provisions of section 31-12-116 (5) shall be applicable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1083, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1221, § 6, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-110. Findings.

Upon the completion of the hearing, the governing body of the annexing municipality, by resolution, shall set forth its findings of fact and its conclusion based thereon with reference to the following matters:

Whether or not the requirements of the applicable provisions of section 30 of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 have been met;

Whether or not an election is required under section 30 (1)(a) of article II of the state constitution and section 31-12-107 (2).

The governing body shall also determine whether or not additional terms and conditions are to be imposed.

A finding that the area proposed for annexation does not comply with the applicable provisions of section 30 of article II of the state constitution or sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 shall terminate the annexation proceeding.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1084, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 917, § 7, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-110 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-111. Annexation without election.

If the resolution of the governing body adopted pursuant to section 31-12-110 determines that the applicable provisions of section 30 of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 have been met, and further determines that an election is not required under section 31-12-107 (2), and does not determine that additional terms and conditions are to be imposed, the governing body may thereupon annex the area proposed to be annexed by ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1084, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 917, § 8, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-112. Election - annexation pursuant to election.

If the governing body determines that an annexation election is required under the provisions of section 30 (1)(a) of article II of the state constitution and section 31-12-107 (2) or that additional terms and conditions should be imposed upon the area proposed to be annexed, an election shall be called, as provided in this section, to determine whether a majority of the landowners and the registered electors in the area proposed to be annexed approve such annexation, with such terms and conditions, if any, as may attach thereto.

Any landowner owning land in the area proposed to be annexed may vote, irrespective of whether he or she is a registered elector. Any corporate landowner may by resolution designate one of its officers to cast its vote; except that nothing in this part 1 shall invalidate any memorandum of agreement or escrow arrangement voluntarily made by and between the annexing municipality and one or more landowners within the area proposed to be annexed nor require an election for the approval of any terms and conditions to be accomplished or assured in this manner.

The municipality shall forthwith petition the district court of the county in which the area proposed to be annexed or a part thereof is located to hold such election.

Upon receipt of such petition, the court shall appoint three commissioners, one of whom shall be nominated by the municipality, one of whom shall be a landowner of land in the area proposed to be annexed or such landowner's nominee, and the third shall be acceptable to the other two. All of the commissioners shall be residents of the state of Colorado and willing to serve as such commissioners. The appointees, within three days after the date of their appointment, shall take an oath before the court faithfully to perform their duties. In case of disability or failure of any commissioner to act, the court shall forthwith fill his place with some person competent, willing, and able to act.

Such commissioners shall forthwith call an election of all the landowners and the registered electors in the area proposed to be annexed, to be held at some convenient place within the area proposed to be annexed. The commissioners shall establish such polling places within the area proposed to be annexed, or immediately adjacent thereto if such area is vacant and unoccupied, as in their judgment are necessary to afford all of the landowners and the registered electors the opportunity to cast their votes. If more than one polling place is found to be necessary, the court may appoint three additional persons to act as judges or clerks for each additional polling place. Such additional judges and clerks shall meet the same requirements as the original appointees.

Notice of such election shall be given by publication once a week for four weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the area and published in the county in which such area is located or, if there is no such newspaper in the county, in some newspaper of general circulation published in an adjacent county. Additional notice shall be given by posting a notice at each polling place. The said posting and first newspaper publication shall be not less than four weeks preceding such election. Such notice shall specify the time and place of such election, shall contain a description of the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, and shall state that a map or plat thereof is on file in the office of the clerk of the district court in which such area, or a part thereof, is located. Such notice shall also set forth the conditions and requirements proposed by the governing body for annexation of the area, and it shall inform the public that an issue committee is required by law to register with the appropriate officer pursuant to section 1-45-108, C.R.S., within ten calendar days of accepting or making contributions or expenditures in excess of two hundred dollars to support or oppose the annexation question.

Such commissioners and additional appointees provided for in subsection (5) of this section shall act as judges or clerks of the election, shall take the oath required by law for judges of general elections, and shall report the result of the voting in their respective polling places to the court within three days after such election. The court shall allow each judge and clerk a reasonable compensation for his services as such, not exceeding two dollars for each hour necessarily employed in the performance of his duties.

The ballot used in such election shall contain the words "For Annexation" and "Against Annexation". At the time of voting, each voter shall indicate his choice by placing a cross mark (X) opposite one or the other of said groups of words. Voting machines may be used in the same manner as in municipal elections.

If a majority of the votes cast at such election are against annexation or the vote is tied, the court shall order that all annexation proceedings to date are void and of no effect and that the governing body shall proceed no further with the instant annexation proceedings. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are for annexation, the court shall order, adjudge, and decree that such area may be annexed to the municipality upon the terms and conditions, if any, set forth by the governing body, and the municipality, by ordinance, may thereafter annex said area and impose the terms and conditions, if any, as approved by the landowners and the registered electors.

All costs and expenses connected with such annexation election, including commissioner fees and all election expenses when incurred, shall be paid by the municipality to which the annexation is proposed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1084, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (HB 09-1153), ch. 174, p. 776, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (2), (5), and (9) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 917, § 9, effective August 11; (1) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2127, § 192, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-112 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For municipal elections, see article 10 of this title.

31-12-113. Effective date of annexation - required filings.

If the conditions of subsection (2) of this section are met, area annexed to a municipality, as provided in this part 1, shall be annexed upon the effective date of the annexing ordinance, except as otherwise provided in sections 31-12-118 and 31-12-118.5 and for tax purposes as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The annexing municipality shall:

File one copy of the annexation map with the original of the annexation ordinance in the office of the clerk of the annexing municipality;

File for recording three certified copies of the annexation ordinance and map of the area annexed containing a legal description of such area with the county clerk and recorder of each county affected.

The county clerk and recorder of each county involved shall file one certified copy of such annexation ordinance and map with the division of local government of the department of local affairs and one certified copy of such annexation ordinance and map with the department of revenue.

Upon receiving an annexation ordinance and map pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the department of revenue shall communicate with any taxing entities affected by the annexation in order to facilitate the administration and collection of taxes within the annexed areas and to identify all retailers affected by the annexation. The department of revenue shall make copies of any such ordinances and maps available to all taxing entities in the state, including any special districts that impose a sales tax.

No annexation shall be effective until the requirements of sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) are met.

In any action attacking the validity of an annexation proceeding, failure of the annexing municipality to have made the filings required by this subsection (2) shall not be deemed to invalidate the annexation where good cause for such failure is shown.

An annexation shall be effective for the purpose of general taxation on and after the January 1 next ensuing.

In the event that an annexation which has the effect of changing county lines occurs before January 1, the assessor of the county from which such area was detached shall provide to the assessor of the county to which such area has been added, on or before the February 1 next ensuing, the following:

An abstract of the total valuation for assessment of all taxable property so transferred;

A certified copy of the assessment records of the individual properties in the annexed area as of the effective date of annexation containing the legal description, the name and address of the owner, and the valuation for assessment of all taxable property, together with such supporting records as are required by the regulations of the property tax administrator.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1086, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1, § 1, effective February 1.

L. 2000:

(2)(a)(II) amended and (2)(a.5) added, p. 422, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-113 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-114. Conflicting annexation claims of two or more municipalities.

At any time during a period of notice given by a municipality pursuant to section 31-12-108, any other municipality may, subject to compliance with section 30 of article II of the state constitution, receive a petition for annexation or a petition for an annexation election pursuant to section 31-12-107 with the area partly or wholly overlapping the area proposed for annexation by the first municipality. If this occurs, the respective rights of the several municipalities shall be determined in accordance with an election as provided in this section.

All further proceedings for the annexation of the area claimed by both municipalities shall be held in abeyance pending the holding of an election of the landowners and the registered electors within such area as described in subsection (4) of this section for the purpose of determining to which municipality such electors prefer to annex. This election shall be held pursuant to the provisions of section 31-12-112, except as provided in this section.

The second municipality indicating its intent to annex shall petition the district court of the county in which the area proposed to be annexed is located for the election provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Such petition shall be filed within thirty days after the effective date of the resolution of intent or the date of the filing of the petition described in subsection (1) of this section.

All of the landowners and the registered electors in the area claimed by both municipalities shall be entitled to vote at said election. Any corporate landowner may by resolution designate one of its officers to cast its vote.

If the disputed area has less than two-thirds boundary contiguity with either municipality, the ballot shall contain two questions:

"For Annexation" and "Against Annexation"; and

"For annexation to .................... ".

(name of municipality first starting proceedings)

and "For annexation to ....................
".

(name of municipality second starting proceedings).

If more than two municipalities dispute the same area, the ballot shall list each municipality in order of the date when it started proceedings under this part 1 and in the same form as specified in this section. If the disputed area does have more than two-thirds boundary contiguity with one of the municipalities, only the question in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall appear on the ballot. If both questions are to appear on the ballot, the notice of the election shall contain a statement that all of the landowners and the registered electors may vote on the second question irrespective of their votes on the first question.

If, upon a canvass of the votes, it is found that a majority of the votes cast were against annexation, or that the vote on the issue of annexation is tied, or that the vote on which municipality should annex is tied, the court shall declare all annexation proceedings of both municipalities insofar as they relate to the disputed area to be void and of no effect, and both municipalities shall be barred from continuing with the current annexation proceedings insofar as they relate to such disputed area.

If the vote is in favor of annexation, the municipality to which the landowners and the registered electors indicate their intention to annex may proceed to hold a hearing as provided in this part 1 and to comply with the other provisions of this part 1 with respect to the area claimed by both municipalities; if such area is found to comply with the applicable provisions of sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 and if the entire area proposed to be annexed has been in dispute, the subject election shall be deemed to comply with the provisions of sections 31-12-107 and 31-12-112 relative to an election of the landowners and the registered electors for areas having less than two-thirds boundary contiguity with the annexing municipality.

If more than two municipalities claim a disputed area and a majority of the votes are cast in favor of one municipality, that municipality may proceed to hold a hearing as provided in this part 1 and to comply with the other provisions of this part 1 with respect to the area claimed by the several municipalities; but the subject election shall be deemed to comply with the provisions of sections 31-12-107 and 31-12-112 relative to an election of the landowners and the registered electors for areas having less than two-thirds boundary contiguity with the annexing municipality. If no municipality receives a majority, a runoff election between the two municipalities receiving the largest pluralities shall be held no sooner than four weeks and no longer than seven weeks after the date of the initial election to determine to which municipality the landowners and the registered electors desire to annex. Notice of such second election shall be given in the manner directed by the court. This election shall have the same effect as if it were the original election between the two municipalities involved.

Notwithstanding any provision in this part 1 to the contrary, if the total area proposed for annexation or the disputed part thereof has more than two-thirds boundary contiguity with one of the municipalities, that municipality shall have the right to annex the disputed area unless three-fourths of the total votes cast at the election favor annexation to another municipality.

Unless the area claimed by more than one municipality constitutes more than one-third of the area proposed for annexation, inclusive of streets, to the first annexing municipality, nothing in this part 1 shall prevent a municipality from proceeding with the annexation of that part of the area described in its resolution which is not claimed by another municipality without waiting for the holding of the election described in this section. In the hearing required by sections 31-12-108 and 31-12-109 and the findings required by section 31-12-110, the issue shall be the compliance of the undisputed portion of the area proposed for annexation with the requirements and limitations of sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105. If the annexation was initiated by petition under section 31-12-107 and if the requirements of said sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 are met, the annexing municipality shall submit the issue of annexation with the changed boundaries to an election of the landowners and the registered electors to be held in accordance with section 31-12-112.

The costs of the election shall be paid by the municipalities which are disputing the annexation by the first annexing municipality. If more than one municipality is disputing such annexation, the costs shall be apportioned among such disputing municipalities on a just and equitable basis by the court supervising the election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1086, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (2), (4), (5)(b), (7), (8), and (10) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 918, § 10, effective August 11; (1) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2120, § 168, effective August 11.

31-12-115. Zoning of land while annexation is under way - zoning of newly annexed land - subdivision of land while annexation is under way - regulatory impairments affecting newly annexed land used for agricultural purposes - notice - definitions.

An annexing municipality may institute the procedure outlined in state statutes or municipal charter to make land subject to zoning at any time after a petition for annexation or a petition for an annexation election has been found to be valid in accordance with the provisions of section 31-12-107. The proposed zoning ordinance shall not be passed on final reading prior to the date when the annexation ordinance is passed on final reading. If the zoning process is commenced prior to the effective date of the annexation ordinance, the legal protest area for zoning shall be determined solely on geographic location, irrespective of whether the land in such legal protest area is within or without or partly within and partly without the annexing municipality.

If the municipality has a zoning ordinance, any area annexed on or after January 1, 1966, shall be brought under such zoning ordinance and map within ninety days after the effective date of the annexation ordinance, irrespective of any legal review which may be instituted pursuant to section 31-12-116.

During such ninety-day period or such portion thereof required to comply with subsection (2) of this section, the annexing municipality may refuse to issue any building or occupancy permit for any portion or all of the newly annexed area.

Any provision in a zoning ordinance automatically applying a uniform zoning classification to all land which may be annexed in the future is void and of no effect as to any annexation completed on or after January 1, 1966.

Any annexing municipality may institute the procedure outlined in its subdivision regulations to subdivide land in the area proposed to be annexed at any time after a petition for annexation or a petition for an annexation election has been found to be valid in accordance with the provisions of section 31-12-107. The ordinance accepting the proposed subdivision shall not be passed on final reading prior to the date when the annexation is passed on final reading.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a municipality annexes an area that contains any portion of a public transportation right-of-way, a customary or regular use of which involves the movement of any agricultural vehicles and equipment, for the period during which land use within the annexed area is devoted to agricultural use and regardless of whether the annexed area has been zoned for agricultural uses, the municipality shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation affecting the right-of-way, whether arising in connection with zoning, rezoning, the regulation of traffic, or otherwise, so as to restrict such customary or regular use of the right-of-way that is in existence as of the time of the annexation. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall be construed as in any way restricting the municipality from adopting or enforcing traffic regulations that are either consistent with the customary or regular use of the right-of-way or are necessary for the safety of vehicular and pedestrian traffic using the right-of-way.

In addition to any other applicable notice requirements provided by law, not less than thirty days prior to final adoption of an ordinance or regulation affecting the right-of-way in an annexed area that is devoted to agricultural use and regardless of whether the annexed area has been zoned for agricultural uses, the municipality shall send notice of the proposed ordinance or regulation to the following persons by means of the following methods:

To any person who owns property in the annexed area that is contiguous to the right-of-way, by certified mail; and

To such persons as appear on a list maintained by the municipality of interested persons who are to receive such notice by first-class mail. The name of any such person shall remain on the list until such time as the person requests removal of the person's name from the list.

For purposes of this subsection (6), "agricultural vehicles and equipment" means any vehicle or equipment that is designed, adapted, or used for agricultural purposes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1088, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 996, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2004:

(6) added, p. 618, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-115 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-116. Review.

If any landowner or any registered elector in the area proposed to be annexed, the board of county commissioners of any county governing the area proposed to be annexed, or any municipality within one mile of the area proposed to be annexed believes itself to be aggrieved by the acts of the governing body of the annexing municipality in annexing said area to said municipality, such acts or findings of the governing body may be reviewed by certiorari in accordance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Such review proceedings shall be instituted in any district court having jurisdiction of the county in which the annexed area is located. In no event shall such a proceeding be instituted prior to the effective date of the annexing ordinance by the annexing municipality.

If the annexed area is located within two or more counties, review proceedings may be brought in any district court having jurisdiction of any one of such counties. In all such certiorari proceedings under this part 1, the district court shall be presided over by a judge appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court of the state of Colorado, which judge shall not be from the judicial district in which the area proposed to be annexed is located nor from a judicial district contiguous thereto.

All such actions to review the findings and the decision of the governing body shall be brought within sixty days after the effective date of the ordinance, and, if such action is not brought within such time, such action shall forever be barred.
(2) (a) (I) All such actions to review the findings and the decision of the governing body shall be brought within sixty days after the effective date of the ordinance, and, if such action is not brought within such time, such action shall forever be barred.

All such actions to review the findings and the decision of the governing body shall be subject to the following requirement, which is a condition precedent to the right to obtain judicial review under this section: Any party bringing such action shall first have filed a motion for reconsideration within ten days of the effective date of the ordinance finalizing the challenged annexation, which motion shall state with particularity the grounds upon which judicial review is sought.

The district court shall schedule such actions for expedited hearing.

In the event that the person bringing an action pursuant to this section fails to substantially prevail, the court may award the municipality its reasonable attorney fees and costs of defense.

In any action brought within the sixty-day limitation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to review the annexation of an enclave pursuant to section 31-12-106 (1), the court may review the findings and determinations of the governing body in annexing any territory which, in whole or in part, resulted in the creation of the enclave. If the court finds that any such prior annexation resulted in the creation of a municipal boundary that consists of public rights-of-way as set forth in section 31-12-106 (1.1)(a)(I) or occurred without compliance with section 30 of article II of the state constitution as set forth in section 31-12-106 (1.1)(a)(II), it shall declare the annexation of the enclave to be void, but no such finding or decision shall affect the validity of the prior annexation.

Review proceedings instituted under this section shall not be extended further than to determine whether the governing body has exceeded its jurisdiction or abused its discretion under the provisions of this part 1.

Any annexation accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this part 1 shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as expressly authorized in this section.

If the hearing has not been stenographically reported as provided in section 31-12-109 (2) and if the court determines, after proper investigation, that the minutes of the hearing are not adequate to form the basis for a determination of the issue in the certiorari proceedings, the court may proceed to try the issue de novo.

All proceedings for judicial review of any annexation proceeding under this part 1 shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and heard at the earliest practical moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1089, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1511, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1221, § 7, effective May 28.

L. 90:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1479, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 97:

(2)(b) amended, p. 996, § 6, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1008, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 919, § 11, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-116 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-117. Effect of review and of voiding of annexation ordinance by court order.

After the effective date of an annexation ordinance, the annexing municipality shall apply all pertinent ordinances to the annexed area, irrespective of any proceedings for judicial review.

In the event that the district court enters a final judgment, as defined in rule 54 (a), Colorado rules of civil procedure, declaring the annexation proceedings void, no acts taken in compliance with or pursuant to the charter, ordinances, or regulations of the annexing municipality shall be voided thereby, even though such acts are not in compliance with applicable county requirements or the requirements of other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations having jurisdiction over the area affected by such judicial proceedings. Such acts shall include, among others, subdivision platting and the construction and occupancy of improvements. A judicial declaration voiding an annexation shall not invalidate the levy and collection of any taxes, license fees, or charges collected or imposed by the annexing municipality prior to such final judgment.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall apply with equal force and validity to judicial review of any annexation proceedings which have affected the boundaries of any county or city and county; except that, within ninety days after the effective date of such a final judgment, the county clerk and recorder of the county or city and county to which the area was attempted to be annexed shall transmit to the county clerk and recorder of the county to which the territory was returned as a result of the judicial determination of the invalidity of the annexation proceedings a copy of each approved subdivision plat, which copy shall then be recorded without charge in the records of the county to which the territory was so returned.

The execution of any final judgment by the district court in any judicial review of an annexation proceeding shall automatically be stayed upon the filing of the record on appeal as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules, and no application for supersedeas shall be necessary. Such stay shall continue in full force and effect pending final disposition of the proceedings on appeal.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1090, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-117 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-118. Priority of annexation proceedings.

The purpose of this section is to give a first priority to annexation proceedings unless certain incorporation proceedings described in this section are commenced for all or part of the area subject to such annexation proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), when a governing body receives a petition for annexation pursuant to section 31-12-107 (1) or a petition for an election on the question of annexation pursuant to section 31-12-107 (2), no other proceedings shall be commenced or prosecuted for the annexation or incorporation of the same area or any part thereof and no other proceedings shall be commenced or prosecuted for the creation of any quasi-municipal corporation in the same area or any part thereof until the question of annexing such area pursuant to any such petition has been finally determined. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall prevent a duly established special service district lawfully organized under part 5 or 6 of article 25 of this title, article 8 of title 29, C.R.S., part 2 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., or title 32 (except article 8), C.R.S., from receiving and prosecuting a petition for the inclusion of the same area or any part thereof within the boundaries of any such special service district during any pending annexation proceeding.

A governing body shall hold annexation proceedings in abeyance if, on or after the date a petition for annexation pursuant to section 31-12-107 (1) or a petition for an election on the question of annexation pursuant to section 31-12-107 (2) is filed, a petition for incorporation of the same area or any part thereof is filed pursuant to part 1 of article 2 of this title and such area contains more than seventy-five thousand inhabitants.

The fact that proceedings for the incorporation of an area have been commenced prior to the filing of a petition for annexation under section 31-12-107 (1) or prior to the filing of a petition for an election on the question of annexation under section 31-12-107 (2) shall in no way affect such proceedings for the annexation of all or part of the same area, and any such incorporation proceedings shall be held in abeyance until the question of annexation has been finally determined. Similarly the fact that proceedings for the creation of a quasi-municipal corporation have been commenced prior to the filing of a petition for annexation under section 31-12-107 (1) or the filing of a petition for an election on the question of annexation under section 31-12-107 (2) shall in no way affect such proceedings for the annexation of all or part of the same area, and any such proceedings for the creation of quasi-municipal corporations shall be held in abeyance until the question of annexation has been finally determined.

This section shall not apply if the petition for annexation under said section 31-12-107 (1) or the petition for an election on the question of annexation under said section 31-12-107 (2) is first filed with the governing body within the ten days next preceding the date set for an election on the question of incorporation or an election on the question of the creation of a quasi-municipal corporation in part or all of the same area, nor shall this section apply to any incorporation petition involving an area which contains more than ten thousand inhabitants.

In the event of any lawsuit challenging the provisions of this section or their applicability to any situation, such legal proceedings shall be advanced on the docket as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practical moment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1090, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1614, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1, § 2, effective February 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-118 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-118.5. Effect of incorporation proceedings in an area of more than seventy-five thousand inhabitants - annexation ordinance - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Incorporation of areas containing more than seventy-five thousand inhabitants into new municipalities furthers the goal of orderly growth of urban communities and achieves the purposes stated in section 31-12-102;

Municipal incorporations of areas containing such population present viable municipal communities and are favored over municipal annexations that may fragment affected communities and reduce or eliminate the ability to provide municipal government, services, and facilities to those communities;

The current municipal annexation and incorporation laws do not adequately expressly address the priority to be given municipal incorporation of areas containing such population;

This section and section 31-12-118 (2)(b) are necessary to provide remedial direction regarding the jurisdiction of municipalities to subject areas containing such population to municipal annexation and, therefore, that each section shall apply on and after February 1, 1999, to all annexation proceedings that are pending or subject to judicial review or appeal commenced pursuant to sections 31-12-116 and 31-12-117 whether or not such review or appeal is sought;

The enactment of this section and section 31-12-118 (2)(b) is not violative of section 11 of article II of the Colorado constitution with respect to annexation proceedings that are pending or subject to judicial review or appeal on February 1, 1999, since:

Section 11 of article II of the Colorado constitution applies solely to statutes that take away or impair a vested right acquired under existing laws or that impose a new duty or create a new obligation with respect to completed transactions or considerations;

No person has a vested right in any annexation proceedings that are pending or subject to judicial review or appeal on February 1, 1999, that will be impaired by this section or section 31-12-118 (2)(b); and

This section and section 31-12-118 (2)(b) do not impose a new duty or create a new obligation with respect to any municipal annexation that is completed and that is final and no longer subject to judicial review or appeal.

If a petition for an incorporation election is filed pursuant to part 1 of article 2 of this title, then no annexation ordinance that annexes all or any part of the area included in such petition shall be deemed final. This subsection (2) shall apply only if such area proposed for incorporation contains more than seventy-five thousand inhabitants and such petition is filed:

(I) Prior to the expiration of the sixty-day limitation on review proceedings contained in section 31-12-116 (2)(a); or

(II) After a review proceeding on such annexation ordinance has been commenced pursuant to section 31-12-116 and prior to the date of a judicial declaration or final judgment, including an appellate judgment, on such review proceeding.

If such incorporation election is approved by a court order entered pursuant to section 31-2-103, then such annexation ordinance shall be deemed void with respect to any area that is incorporated pursuant to such election.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 2, § 3, effective February 1.

31-12-119. Disconnection of territory because of failure to serve.

The landowners of any tract or contiguous tracts of land aggregating five acres or more located on a boundary of the municipality at the time of the disconnection action may, three or more years after annexation, petition for disconnection from the municipality if such municipality does not, upon demand, provide the same municipal services on the same general terms and conditions as the rest of the municipality receives. The procedure for such disconnection shall be as set forth in parts 6 and 7 of this article, insofar as consistent with this section. To the extent that such parts are inconsistent with this section, the provisions of this section shall prevail when the action is based on failure of the municipality to serve an annexed area.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1091, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-119 as it existed prior to 1975.